District of Columbia statutes.
19-1508

Disclaimer of interest by trustee.

If a trustee disclaims an interest in property that otherwise would have become trust property, the interest does not become trust property.

History

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-205, § 2(b), 53 DCR 9063

Section References

This section is referenced in § 19-1506.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 8 of the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act (1999).